Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6203
Definitions,
where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Regulation
of Health Professions Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions
found in sections 71-6204 to 71-6220.01 shall be used.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 103;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 5.
July 19, 2012